Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.030

Compelling attendance of witnesses.

In event any person shall refuse to appear in compliance with any subpoena issued by the director or shall refuse to testify thereunder, the superior court of the state of Washington for the county in which such witness was required by said subpoena to appear, upon application of the director, shall have jurisdiction to compel such witness to attend and testify and to punish for contempt any witness not complying with the order of the court.

[ 1994 c 92 s 418; 1945 c 235 s 96; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-215. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 94, 95; 1919 c 169 s 12; 1913 c 110 s 19.]